Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER 531B]

DISPOSITION
OF REMAINS

Section

531B-1 Short title

531B-2 Definitions

531B-3 Direction for disposition

531B-4 Right to control disposition; priority

531B-5 Written instrument to control disposition
of remains

531B-6 Forfeiture of right to direct disposition

531B-7 Disputes

531B-8 Right to rely on representations

531B-9 Authority to direct and control
disposition; recovery

of reasonable expenses

531B-10 Disposition of unclaimed cremated remains

531B-11 Immunity

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next